California, session 20252026, AB2404.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33000.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:33000.1. (a) At least one member of the State Board of Education shall be from the San Joaquin Valley.(b) For purposes of this section, “San Joaquin Valley” means the geographical area consisting of all of the following:(1) The County of Fresno.(2) The County of Kern.(3) The County of Kings.(4) The County of Madera.(5) The County of Merced.(6) The County of San Joaquin.(7) The County of Stanislaus.(8) The County of Tulare.(c) This section does not prohibit a member of the board who does not meet the requirement described in subdivision (a) from serving the remainder of the member’s term.SEC. 2. Section 51226.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:51226.1. (a) Upon adoption of the model curriculum standards developed pursuant to Section 51226, the Superintendent shall develop a curriculum framework consistent with criteria set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 60005 that offers a blueprint for implementation of career and technical education. The framework shall be adopted no later than November 1, 2006.(b) In developing the framework, the Superintendent shall work in consultation and coordination with an advisory group, including, but not limited to, representatives from all of the following:(1) Business and industry.(2) Labor.(3) The California Community Colleges.(4) The University of California.(5) The California State University.(6) Classroom teachers.(7) School administrators.(8) Pupils.(9) Parents and guardians.(10) Representatives of the Legislature.(11) The department.(12) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.(c) (1) In convening the membership of the advisory group set forth in subdivision (b), the Superintendent is encouraged to seek representation broadly reflective of the state population.(2) (A) In convening the membership of the advisory group set forth in subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall ensure at least one member is from the San Joaquin Valley.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “San Joaquin Valley” means the geographical area consisting of all of the following:(i) The County of Fresno.(ii) The County of Kern.(iii) The County of Kings.(iv) The County of Madera.(v) The County of Merced.(vi) The County of San Joaquin.(vii) The County of Stanislaus.(viii) The County of Tulare.(d) Costs incurred by the superintendent in complying with this section shall be covered, to the extent permitted by federal law, by the state administrative and leadership funds available pursuant to the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Technical Education Act of 1998 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.).(e) In developing the framework, the Superintendent shall consider developing frameworks for various career pathways that will prepare pupils for both career entry and matriculation into postsecondary education.(f) Upon completion of the framework, the advisory group is encouraged to identify career technical education courses that meet state-adopted academic content standards and that satisfy high school graduation requirements and admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, and to determine the extent to which local educational agencies accept credit earned for the completion of those courses, in lieu of other courses of study.(g) The adoption of the framework developed and adopted pursuant to this section by a local educational agency shall be voluntary.SEC. 3. Section 1347.16 is added to the Health and Safety Code, immediately following Section 1347.15, to read:1347.16. (a) At least one member of the Financial Solvency Standards Board shall be from the San Joaquin Valley.(b) For purposes of this section, “San Joaquin Valley” means the geographical area consisting of all of the following:(1) The County of Fresno.(2) The County of Kern.(3) The County of Kings.(4) The County of Madera.(5) The County of Merced.(6) The County of San Joaquin.(7) The County of Stanislaus.(8) The County of Tulare.(c) This section does not prohibit a member of the board who does not meet the requirement described in subdivision (a) from serving the remainder of the member’s term.SEC. 4. Section 125290.31 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:125290.31. (a) At least one member of the Citizen’s Financial Accountability Oversight Committee shall be from the San Joaquin Valley.(b) For purposes of this section, “San Joaquin Valley” means the geographical area consisting of all of the following:(1) The County of Fresno.(2) The County of Kern.(3) The County of Kings.(4) The County of Madera.(5) The County of Merced.(6) The County of San Joaquin.(7) The County of Stanislaus.(8) The County of Tulare.(c) This section does not prohibit a member of the board who does not meet the requirement described in subdivision (a) from serving the remainder of the member’s term.SEC. 5. Section 66.3 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:66.3. (a) At least one member of the California Veterans Board shall be from the San Joaquin Valley.(b) For purposes of this section, “San Joaquin Valley” means the geographical area consisting of all of the following:(1) The County of Fresno.(2) The County of Kern.(3) The County of Kings.(4) The County of Madera.(5) The County of Merced.(6) The County of San Joaquin.(7) The County of Stanislaus.(8) The County of Tulare.(c) This section does not prohibit a member of the board who does not meet the requirement described in subdivision (a) from serving the remainder of the member’s term.